Texas statutes.
HEALTH AND SAFETY CODE

TITLE 4. HEALTH FACILITIES

SUBTITLE B. LICENSING OF HEALTH FACILITIES

CHAPTER 250. NURSE AIDE REGISTRY AND CRIMINAL HISTORY CHECKS OF EMPLOYEES AND APPLICANTS FOR EMPLOYMENT IN CERTAIN FACILITIES SERVING THE ELDERLY, PERSONS WITH DISABILITIES, OR PERSONS WITH TERMINAL ILLNESSES

Sec. 250.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Nurse aide registry" means a list maintained by the Department of Aging and Disability Services of nurse aides under the Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1987 (Pub. L. No. 100-203).

(1-a) "Consumer" means a resident of or an individual receiving services from a facility covered by this chapter.

Text of subdivision effective until April 01, 2025

(1-b) "Consumer-directed service option" has the meaning assigned by Section 531.051, Government Code.

Text of subdivision effective on April 01, 2025

(1-b) "Consumer-directed service option" has the meaning assigned by Section 546.0101, Government Code.

(2) "Direct contact with a consumer" means any contact with a consumer.

(3) "Facility" means:

(A) a nursing facility, custodial care home, or other institution licensed by the Department of Aging and Disability Services under Chapter 242;

(B) an assisted living facility licensed by the Department of Aging and Disability Services under Chapter 247;

(C) a home and community support services agency licensed under Chapter 142;

(D) a day activity and health services facility licensed by the Department of Aging and Disability Services under Chapter 103, Human Resources Code;

(E) an ICF-IID licensed under Chapter 252;

(F) an adult foster care provider that contracts with the Department of Aging and Disability Services;

(G) a facility that provides mental health services and that is operated by or contracts with the Department of State Health Services;

(H) a local mental health authority designated under Section 533.035 or a local intellectual and developmental disability authority designated under Section 533.035;

(I) a person exempt from licensing under Section 142.003(a)(19) or (20);

(J) a special care facility licensed by the Department of State Health Services under Chapter 248;

(K) a mental health service unit of a hospital licensed under Chapter 241; or

(L) a prescribed pediatric extended care center licensed by the Department of Aging and Disability Services under Chapter 248A.

Text of subdivision effective until April 01, 2025

(3-a) "Financial management services agency" means an entity that contracts with the Department of Aging and Disability Services to serve as a fiscal and employer agent for an individual employer in the consumer-directed service option described by Section 531.051, Government Code.

Text of subdivision effective on April 01, 2025

(3-a) "Financial management services agency" means an entity that contracts with the commission to serve as a fiscal and employer agent for an individual employer in the consumer-directed service option described by Section 546.0101, Government Code.

(3-b) "Individual employer" means an individual or legally authorized representative who participates in the consumer-directed service option and is responsible for hiring service providers to deliver program services.

(4) "Private agency" means a person engaged in the business of obtaining criminal history checks on behalf of a facility.

(5) "Regulatory agency" means a state agency referred to in Subdivision (3).

(6) "Commission" means the Health and Human Services Commission.

(7) "Executive commissioner" means the executive commissioner of the commission.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 747, Sec. 25, eff. Sept. 1, 1993. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 831, Sec. 1, eff. June 16, 1995; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 233, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1209, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 198, Sec. 2.198, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1189 (H.B. 3737), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 879 (S.B. 223), Sec. 3.01, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 980 (H.B. 1720), Sec. 19, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 363 (H.B. 2683), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2014.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 605 (S.B. 944), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1168 (S.B. 492), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.0755, eff. April 2, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1231 (S.B. 1999), Sec. 4, eff. June 19, 2015.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 434 (S.B. 1103), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 958 (S.B. 1808), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 2.47, eff. April 1, 2025.

Sec. 250.002. INFORMATION OBTAINED BY FACILITY, REGULATORY AGENCY, OR PRIVATE AGENCY. (a) A regulatory agency or a financial management services agency on behalf of an individual employer is entitled to obtain from the Department of Public Safety of the State of Texas criminal history record information maintained by the Department of Public Safety that relates to a person who is:

(1) an applicant for employment at a facility other than a facility licensed under Chapter 142;

(2) an employee of a facility other than a facility licensed under Chapter 142;

(3) an applicant for employment at or an employee of a facility licensed under Chapter 142 whose employment duties would or do involve direct contact with a consumer in the facility; or

(4) an applicant for employment by or an employee of an individual employer.

(a-1) A facility or a private agency on behalf of a facility is entitled to obtain from the Department of Public Safety of the State of Texas criminal history record information maintained by the Department of Public Safety that relates to a person who is:

(1) an applicant for employment with, an employee of, or a volunteer with the facility;

(2) an applicant for employment with or an employee of a person or business that contracts with the facility;

(3) an applicant for employment by or an employee of an individual employer; or

(4) a student enrolled in an educational program or course of study who is at the facility for educational purposes.

(b) A facility may:

(1) pay a private agency to obtain criminal history record information for a person described by Subsection (a-1) directly from the Department of Public Safety of the State of Texas; or

(2) obtain the information directly from the Department of Public Safety.

(c) The private agency shall forward criminal history record information received under this section to the facility requesting the information.

(c-1) A financial management services agency shall forward criminal history record information received under this section to the individual employer requesting the information.

(d) The executive commissioner of the Health and Human Services Commission may adopt rules relating to the processing of information requested or obtained under this chapter.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 747, Sec. 25, eff. Sept. 1, 1993. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 831, Sec. 1, eff. June 16, 1995; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1025, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1267, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 879 (S.B. 223), Sec. 3.02, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 980 (H.B. 1720), Sec. 20, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 266 (H.B. 729), Sec. 3, eff. June 14, 2013.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.0756, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 250.003. VERIFICATION OF EMPLOYABILITY; ANNUAL SEARCH; DISCHARGE. (a) A facility or individual employer may not employ an applicant:

(1) if the facility or individual employer determines, as a result of a criminal history check, that the applicant has been convicted of an offense listed in this chapter that bars employment or that a conviction is a contraindication to employment with the facility or to direct contact with the individual using the consumer-directed service option;

(2) if the applicant is a nurse aide, until the facility or individual employer further verifies that the applicant is listed in the nurse aide registry; and

(3) until the facility or individual employer verifies that the applicant is not designated in the registry maintained under this chapter or in the employee misconduct registry maintained under Section 253.007 as having a finding entered into the registry concerning abuse, neglect, or mistreatment of an individual using the consumer-directed service option or a consumer, or misappropriation of the property of an individual using the consumer-directed service option or of a consumer.

(a-1) Except for an applicant for employment at or an employee of a facility licensed under Chapter 242 or 247, a person licensed under another law of this state is exempt from the requirements of this chapter.

(a-2) If a facility employs a person pending a criminal history check, the facility shall ensure that the person has no direct contact with a consumer until the facility obtains the person's criminal history record information and verifies the person's employability under Section 250.006.

(b) The facility may not employ an applicant covered by Subsection (a), except that in an emergency requiring immediate employment, a facility may hire on a temporary or interim basis a person not listed in the registry pending the results of a criminal conviction check, which must be requested:

(1) within 72 hours of employment; or

(2) if the facility is licensed under Chapter 242 or 247, within 24 hours of employment.

(c) A facility or individual employer shall immediately discharge any employee:

(1) who is designated in the nurse aide registry or the employee misconduct registry established under Chapter 253 as having committed an act of abuse, neglect, or mistreatment of an individual using the consumer-directed service option or a consumer, or misappropriation of the property of an individual using the consumer-directed service option or of a consumer; or

(2) whose criminal history check reveals conviction of a crime that bars employment or that the individual employer or the facility determines is a contraindication to employment as provided by this chapter.

(c-1) Repealed by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 363, Sec. 11, eff. January 1, 2014.

(d) In addition to the initial verification of employability, a facility or an individual employer or financial management services agency on behalf of an individual employer shall:

(1) annually search the nurse aide registry maintained under this chapter and the employee misconduct registry maintained under Section 253.007 to determine whether any employee of the facility or of an individual employer is designated in either registry as having abused, neglected, or exploited a consumer or an individual using the consumer-directed service option; and

(2) maintain in the facility's or individual employer's books and records a copy of the results of the search conducted under Subdivision (1).

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 747, Sec. 25, eff. Sept. 1, 1993. Renumbered from Health & Safety Code Sec. 250.002 and amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 831, Sec. 1, eff. June 16, 1995. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1025, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1267, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 911, Sec. 1, eff. June 20, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 436 (H.B. 2191), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 763 (S.B. 806), Sec. 6, eff. June 19, 2009.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 763 (S.B. 806), Sec. 7, eff. June 19, 2009.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 91 (S.B. 1303), Sec. 27.001(27), eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 879 (S.B. 223), Sec. 3.03, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 980 (H.B. 1720), Sec. 21, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 363 (H.B. 2683), Sec. 2, eff. January 1, 2014.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 363 (H.B. 2683), Sec. 11, eff. January 1, 2014.

Sec. 250.0035. CERTIFICATE OF REGISTRATION; REQUIREMENTS FOR INCLUSION IN NURSE AIDE REGISTRY. (a) To be listed on the nurse aide registry, an applicant must:

(1) complete a training program approved by the commission that includes:

(A) not less than 100 hours of course work as specified by rule; and

(B) a competency evaluation on completion of the training program; and

(2) hold a certificate of registration issued by the commission on completion of the training program required under Subdivision (1).

(b) A certificate of registration and listing on the nurse aide registry expire on the second anniversary of the date the certificate is issued and the nurse aide is listed in the registry.

(c) To renew a nurse aide's certificate of registration and listing on the registry, the nurse aide must complete at least 24 hours of in-service education every two years, including training in geriatrics and, if applicable, in the care of patients with Alzheimer's disease.

(c-1) Chapter 53, Occupations Code, does not apply to the issuance or renewal of a nurse aide's certificate of registration or an applicant's inclusion in the nurse aide registry under this section.

(d) The executive commissioner shall adopt the rules necessary to implement this section, including rules for the issuance and renewal of a certificate of registration under this section and the regulation of nurse aides as necessary to protect the public health and safety.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 408 (S.B. 795), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 434 (S.B. 1103), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1136 (S.B. 681), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 250.004. CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD OF EMPLOYEES. (a) Identifying information of an employee in a covered facility or of an employee of an individual employer shall be submitted electronically, on disk, or on a typewritten form to the Department of Public Safety to obtain the person's criminal conviction record when the person applies for employment and at other times as the facility or individual employer may determine appropriate. In this subsection, "identifying information" includes:

(1) the complete name, race, and sex of the employee;

(2) any known identifying number of the employee, including social security number, driver's license number, or state identification number; and

(3) the employee's date of birth.

(b) If the Department of Public Safety reports that a person has a criminal conviction of any kind, the conviction shall be reviewed by the facility, the financial management services agency, or the individual employer to determine if the conviction may bar the person from employment in a facility or by the individual employer under Section 250.006 or if the conviction may be a contraindication to employment.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 747, Sec. 25, eff. Sept. 1, 1993. Renumbered from Health & Safety Code Sec. 250.003 and amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 831, Sec. 1, eff. June 16, 1995; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 629, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1025, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1267, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 879 (S.B. 223), Sec. 3.04, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 980 (H.B. 1720), Sec. 22, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 250.005. NOTICE AND OPPORTUNITY TO BE HEARD CONCERNING ACCURACY OF INFORMATION. (a) If a facility, financial management services agency, or individual employer believes that a conviction may bar a person from employment in a facility or by the individual employer under Section 250.006 or may be a contraindication to employment, the facility or individual employer shall notify the applicant or employee.

(b) The Department of Public Safety of the State of Texas shall give a person notified under Subsection (a) the opportunity to be heard concerning the accuracy of the criminal history record information and shall notify the facility or individual employer if inaccurate information is discovered.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 747, Sec. 25, eff. Sept. 1, 1993. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 5.95(49), eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Renumbered from Health & Safety Code Sec. 250.004 and amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 831, Sec. 1, eff. June 16, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 879 (S.B. 223), Sec. 3.05, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 980 (H.B. 1720), Sec. 23, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 250.006. CONVICTIONS BARRING EMPLOYMENT. (a) A person for whom the facility or the individual employer is entitled to obtain criminal history record information may not be employed in a facility or by an individual employer if the person has been convicted of an offense listed in this subsection:

(1) an offense under Chapter 19, Penal Code (criminal homicide);

(2) an offense under Chapter 20, Penal Code (kidnapping, unlawful restraint, and smuggling of persons);

(3) an offense under Section 21.02, Penal Code (continuous sexual abuse of young child or disabled individual), or Section 21.11, Penal Code (indecency with a child);

(4) an offense under Section 22.011, Penal Code (sexual assault);

(5) an offense under Section 22.02, Penal Code (aggravated assault);

(6) an offense under Section 22.04, Penal Code (injury to a child, elderly individual, or disabled individual);

(7) an offense under Section 22.041, Penal Code (abandoning or endangering a child, elderly individual, or disabled individual);

(8) an offense under Section 22.08, Penal Code (aiding suicide);

(9) an offense under Section 25.031, Penal Code (agreement to abduct from custody);

(10) an offense under Section 25.08, Penal Code (sale or purchase of child);

(11) an offense under Section 28.02, Penal Code (arson);

(12) an offense under Section 29.02, Penal Code (robbery);

(13) an offense under Section 29.03, Penal Code (aggravated robbery);

(14) an offense under Section 21.08, Penal Code (indecent exposure);

(15) an offense under Section 21.12, Penal Code (improper relationship between educator and student);

(16) an offense under Section 21.15, Penal Code (invasive visual recording);

(17) an offense under Section 22.05, Penal Code (deadly conduct);

(18) an offense under Section 22.021, Penal Code (aggravated sexual assault);

(19) an offense under Section 22.07, Penal Code (terroristic threat);

(20) an offense under Section 32.53, Penal Code (exploitation of child, elderly individual, or disabled individual);

(21) an offense under Section 33.021, Penal Code (online solicitation of a minor);

(22) an offense under Section 34.02, Penal Code (money laundering);

(23) an offense under Section 35A.02, Penal Code (health care fraud);

(24) an offense under Section 36.06, Penal Code (obstruction or retaliation);

(25) an offense under Section 42.09, Penal Code (cruelty to livestock animals), or under Section 42.092, Penal Code (cruelty to nonlivestock animals); or

(26) a conviction under the laws of another state, federal law, or the Uniform Code of Military Justice for an offense containing elements that are substantially similar to the elements of an offense listed by this subsection.

(b) A person may not be employed in a position the duties of which involve direct contact with a consumer in a facility or may not be employed by an individual employer before the fifth anniversary of the date the person is convicted of:

(1) an offense under Section 22.01, Penal Code (assault), that is punishable as a Class A misdemeanor or as a felony;

(2) an offense under Section 30.02, Penal Code (burglary);

(3) an offense under Chapter 31, Penal Code (theft), that is punishable as a felony;

(4) an offense under Section 32.45, Penal Code (misapplication of fiduciary property or property of financial institution), that is punishable as a Class A misdemeanor or a felony;

(5) an offense under Section 32.46, Penal Code (fraudulent securing of document execution), that is punishable as a Class A misdemeanor or a felony;

(6) an offense under Section 37.12, Penal Code (false identification as peace officer; misrepresentation of property); or

(7) an offense under Section 42.01(a)(7), (8), or (9), Penal Code (disorderly conduct).

(c) In addition to the prohibitions on employment prescribed by Subsections (a) and (b), a person for whom a facility licensed under Chapter 242 or 247 is entitled to obtain criminal history record information may not be employed in a facility licensed under Chapter 242 or 247 if the person has been convicted:

(1) of an offense under Section 30.02, Penal Code (burglary); or

(2) under the laws of another state, federal law, or the Uniform Code of Military Justice for an offense containing elements that are substantially similar to the elements of an offense under Section 30.02, Penal Code.

(d) For purposes of this section, a person who is placed on deferred adjudication community supervision for an offense listed in this section, successfully completes the period of deferred adjudication community supervision, and receives a dismissal and discharge in accordance with Article 42A.111, Code of Criminal Procedure, is not considered convicted of the offense for which the person received deferred adjudication community supervision.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 747, Sec. 25, eff. Sept. 1, 1993. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 14.39, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Renumbered from Health & Safety Code Sec. 250.005 and amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 831, Sec. 1, eff. June 16, 1995. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 482, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1159, Sec. 1.33, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1025, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1267, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 911, Sec. 2, eff. June 20, 2003; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1084, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1209, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 593 (H.B. 8), Sec. 3.44, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 971 (S.B. 199), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 817 (H.B. 2609), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 879 (S.B. 223), Sec. 3.06, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 980 (H.B. 1720), Sec. 24, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 363 (H.B. 2683), Sec. 3, eff. January 1, 2014.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.0757, eff. April 2, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 770 (H.B. 2299), Sec. 2.68, eff. January 1, 2017.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 381 (H.B. 2894), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 221 (H.B. 375), Sec. 2.22, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 837 (S.B. 109), Sec. 7, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 830 (H.B. 2187), Sec. 7, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 250.007. RECORDS PRIVILEGED. (a) The criminal history records are for the exclusive use of the regulatory agency, the requesting facility, the private agency on behalf of the requesting facility, the financial management services agency on behalf of the individual employer, the individual employer, and the applicant or employee who is the subject of the records.

(b) All criminal records and reports and the information they contain that are received by the regulatory agency or private agency for the purpose of being forwarded to the requesting facility or received by the financial management services agency under this chapter are privileged information.

(c) The criminal records and reports and the information they contain may not be released or otherwise disclosed to any person or agency except on court order or with the written consent of the person being investigated.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 747, Sec. 25, eff. Sept. 1, 1993. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 831, Sec. 1, eff. June 16, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 879 (S.B. 223), Sec. 3.07, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 980 (H.B. 1720), Sec. 25, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 250.008. CRIMINAL PENALTY. (a) A person commits an offense if the person releases or otherwise discloses any information received under this chapter except as prescribed by Section 250.007(b) or (c).

(b) An offense under this section is a Class A misdemeanor.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 747, Sec. 25, eff. Sept. 1, 1993. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 831, Sec. 1, eff. June 16, 1995.

Sec. 250.009. CIVIL LIABILITY. (a) A facility, an officer or employee of a facility, a financial management services agency, or an individual employer is not civilly liable for failure to comply with this chapter if the facility, financial management services agency, or individual employer makes a good faith effort to comply.

(b) A regulatory agency is not civilly liable to a person for criminal history record information forwarded to a requesting facility in accordance with this chapter.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 747, Sec. 25, eff. Sept. 1, 1993. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 831, Sec. 1, eff. June 16, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 879 (S.B. 223), Sec. 3.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 980 (H.B. 1720), Sec. 26, eff. September 1, 2011.